North Carolina, session 2025, SB1057.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings. – The General Assembly finds the following:
(1) When shareholders hire professionals to manage investments, they reasonably
expect those professionals to perform services in the financial interest of the
shareholders and to make recommendations that will enhance investment
value based on financial analyses.
(2) There is a particular need to require disclosures from proxy advisors because
their advice is provided for hundreds of thousands of shareholder votes each
year. Few investors have the resources to independently research every
shareholder vote. Institutional investors often use proxy advisors for guidance
on how to exercise their shareholder voting rights in a manner consistent with
their fiduciary duties.
(3) Directors of publicly held companies also have fiduciary duties to their
shareholders and make recommendations in line with those fiduciary duties.
(4) Proxy advisors have recommended votes against company directors' guidance
and in favor of shareholder proposals based on environmental, social, or
governance (ESG) issues; diversity, equity, or inclusion (DEI) issues; and
social credit and sustainability scores but have not disclosed to investors that
the recommendations were made without conducting a financial analysis to
determine how the recommended votes would affect shareholder value.
(5) The chief operating officer of Glass Lewis, a major proxy advisor, stated
under penalty of perjury that Glass Lewis does not conduct a "written financial
analysis," as defined by this act, before recommending votes on shareholder
proposals, and that other proxy advisors do not do so either. Yet proxy
advisors have advertised that the purpose of their recommendations is
maximizing, increasing, or protecting shareholder value.
(6) These findings raise concern that proxy advisors are engaged in fraudulent or
deceptive practices. They are not disclosing material information to their
clients, who reasonably believe that they are choosing between
recommendations of company directors and a proxy advisor that are based on
dueling financial analyses.
(7) Investors purchasing proxy advisory services should be informed when
recommendations against company management are or are not based on
*S1057-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
financial analyses that consider the recommended vote's effect on the financial
value of the investment. Investors also should be able to access those analyses
upon request, in order to assess whether the analyses are sufficient to uphold
fiduciary standards.
(8) Requiring proxy advisors to provide clear, factual disclosures under these
circumstances helps investors evaluate whether a proxy advisor's
recommendations uphold institutional investors' fiduciary duties of prudence
and loyalty.
(9) Requiring proxy advisors to inform company directors of their
recommendations also promotes disclosures in line with fiduciary duties. For
example, company directors considering a shareholder proposal often have
additional information regarding the costs of the proposal and whether it is in
shareholders' financial interests. Notice of a proxy advisor's recommended
vote on the proposal allows directors seeking to uphold their fiduciary duties
to provide additional responsive information to their shareholders.
SECTION 2. Chapter 78C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 10.
"Proxy Advisor Transparency Act.
"§ 78C-110. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Company. – A publicly traded for-profit corporation, limited liability
company, partnership, or other business entity.
(2) Company proposal. – Any proposal made by a company to its shareholders
that is included in the company's proxy statement, including, but not limited
to, any proposal relating to director nominations or elections, executive
compensation, corporate transactions, corporate structure, auditor selection,
or company policy on any subject.
(3) Default recommendation or policy. – A system or set of rules, principles, or
guidelines designed to assist with voting decisions on any company proposal
or proxy proposal.
(4) Person. – An individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership,
association, or other legal or business entity.
(5) Proxy advisor. – A person who, for compensation, provides a proxy advisory
service to shareholders of a company or to other persons with authority to vote
on behalf of shareholders of a company. The term does not include a bank or
bank holding company or trust company, or a broker-dealer, or an investment
advisor.
(6) Proxy advisory service. – Any of the services provided for in this subdivision
that are in connection with a company headquartered or incorporated in this
State or to a person in this State by a proxy advisor. This term does not include
(i) services carried out as part of in-house securities brokerage, investment
advisory, trust, or estate administrative services; or (ii) a charitable
organization if the organization's gross annual revenue from proxy advisors is
less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and, if applicable,
each affiliated group of the organization has combined gross annual revenue
from proxy advisory services that is less than two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000). The services are as follows:
a. Advice or a recommendation on how to vote on a company proposal
or proxy proposal.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1057-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Proxy statement research and analysis regarding a company proposal
or proxy proposal.
c. Development of proxy voting recommendations or policies, including
establishing default recommendations or policies.
(7) Proxy proposal. – Any proposal made by a shareholder of a company that is
included in the company's proxy statement or has been submitted for inclusion
in the company's proxy statement, including, but not limited to, a proposal
relating to any of the subjects that could be covered by a company proposal.
(8) Shareholder. – A shareholder, unitholder, limited partner, member, or other
equity owner of a company.
(9) Written financial analysis. – A written document that does all of the following:
a. Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial benefits and
costs to a company of implementing a company proposal or proxy
proposal.
b. Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to positively
affect shareholder financial value.
c. Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who
formed the recommendation.
"§ 78C-111. Disclosure of lack of financial analysis to prevent fraud or deceit.
(a) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against company management on a
company proposal or proxy proposal, or makes a default recommendation or policy involving
votes against company management on company proposals or proxy proposals, and the proxy
advisor does not do so based on a written financial analysis, the proxy advisor shall do all of the
following:
(1) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include a clear and
conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder or other person acting on behalf
of a shareholder receiving the proxy advisory service, that does all of the
following:
a. Identifies the service being provided.
b. Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.
c. States that the proxy advisory service has not based its
recommendation or policy on a written financial analysis of the impact
of that recommended action on investors.
(2) For a proxy advisory service under G.S. 78C-110(6)a. or b., concurrently with
providing the proxy advisory service, provide the disclosure under subdivision
(1) of this subsection to the board of directors of each company that is the
subject of the service.
(3) While any proxy advisory services described under this subsection are being
provided, publicly and conspicuously disclose on the homepage or front page
of the proxy advisor's website a statement that the proxy advisory services
include one or more recommendations or policies against company
management on company proposals or proxy proposals that are not based on
a written financial analysis, regarding the impact of the recommendations or
policies on investors.
(b) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against company management on a
company proposal or proxy proposal, or makes a default recommendation or policy involving
votes against company management on company proposals or proxy proposals, and the proxy
advisor does so based on a written financial analysis, the proxy advisor shall do all of the
following:
Senate Bill 1057-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include a clear and
conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder or other person acting on behalf
of a shareholder receiving the proxy advisory service that does all of the
following:
a. Identifies the service being provided.
b. Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue.
c. States that the proxy advisory service has made the recommendation
or policy based on a written financial analysis.
d. States that the analysis is available upon request.
(2) Make the analysis available within a reasonable time to any client of the proxy
advisory service upon request.
(3) For a proxy advisory service covered under G.S. 78C-110(6)a. or b.,
concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, provide a copy of the
analysis to the board of directors of each company that is the subject of the
service.
"§ 78C-112. Enforcement.
(a) A proxy advisor that provides proxy advisory service shall register annually with the
Secretary of State in the manner provided by the Secretary. The proxy advisor shall submit a fee
of one hundred dollars ($100.00) with each annual registration.
(b) A violation of this Article is an unfair and deceptive trade practice under Chapter 75
of the General Statutes and is actionable under the enforcement provisions of that Chapter. The
Attorney General may exercise all investigative powers under Chapter 75 of the General Statutes
if the Attorney General has reason to believe a violation has occurred, is occurring, or is about to
occur.
(c) In addition to enforcement under subsection (a) of this section, any person aggrieved
by a violation of this Article may bring an action seeking a declaratory judgment or injunctive
relief against a proxy advisor. Not later than the seventh day after the date on which an action is
brought under this Article, the plaintiff shall provide written notice to the Attorney General, who
may intervene in the action. For purposes of this subsection, an aggrieved person includes all of
the following:
(1) A recipient of proxy advisory services provided by a proxy advisor.
(2) A company that is the subject of proxy advisory services under
G.S. 78C-110(6)a. or b.
(3) Any shareholder of a company described in subdivision (2) of this
subsection."
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to proxy
advisory services provided on or after that date. Nothing in this act eliminates any claim under
Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, regardless of whether that claim accrues before, on, or after
the effective date of this act.
Page 4 Senate Bill 1057-Second Edition